test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_FemAnim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - жена M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom: жена
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc: жену
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen: жены
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc: жене
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat: жене
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins: женой
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Nom: [жёны, жены]
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Acc: [жён, жен]
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Gen: [жён, жен]
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Loc: [жёнах, женах]
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Dat: [жёнам, женам]
      жена+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Ins: [жёнами, женами]
